nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.aff
FLAG num
SFX 24 Y 162
SFX 24 0 नु/15X .
SFX 24 0 ने/15X,18X .
SFX 24 0 न/15X .
SFX 24 0 दि .
SFX 24 0 दै .
SFX 24 0 दा .
SFX 24 0 दो .
SFX 24 0 न्छु [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछु [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्छौ [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्छस् [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछस् [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्छौँ [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछौँ [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्छेस् [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछेस् [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्छ [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछ [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्छ्यौ [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछ्यौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछे [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्छन् [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्छिन् [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँछिन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 नेछौँ .
SFX 24 0 नेछौ .
SFX 24 0 नेछ .
SFX 24 0 नेछस् .
SFX 24 0 नेछैनौ .
SFX 24 0 नेछैनौँ .
SFX 24 0 नेछैनस् .
SFX 24 0 नेछैनन् .
SFX 24 0 ँथिस् [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्थिस् [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँथ्यौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्थ्यौ [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँथ्यौँ [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्थ्यौँ [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँथे [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्थे [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँथ्यो [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्थ्यो [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँथि  [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्थि  [^उ]
SFX 24 0 ँथिन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 न्थिन् [^उ]
SFX 24 0 दैन .
SFX 24 0 दैनौ .
SFX 24 0 दैनौँ .
SFX 24 0 दिनौ .
SFX 24 0 दैनन् .
SFX 24 0 दैछ .
SFX 24 0 दैछु .
SFX 24 0 दैछौँ .
SFX 24 0 दैनन् .
SFX 24 0 दैनौँ .
SFX 24 0 नेछु .
SFX 24 0 नेछौँ .
SFX 24 0 दैनथ्यो .
SFX 24 0 दैनथे .
SFX 24 0 दैनथि	.
SFX 24 0 यौँ  [इि]
SFX 24 0 ्यौँ  [^उइि]
SFX 24 0 यौ [इि]   
SFX 24 0 ्यौ [^उइि]   
SFX 24 0 यो [इि] 
SFX 24 0 ्यो [^उइि] 
SFX 24 0 ेर  [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एर [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ेन [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एन [िइ]
SFX 24 0 े [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 ए [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ेनन् [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एनन् [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ेनौँ [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एनौँ [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ेनौ [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एनौ [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ेस् [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एस् [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ोस् .
SFX 24 0 ेछ [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एछ [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ेछौँ [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एछौँ [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ेछन् [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एछन् [िइ]
SFX 24 0 ेछौ [^िइउ]
SFX 24 0 एछौ [िइ]
SFX 24 0 नेछैन .
SFX 24 0 ुन्जेल [^उिइ]
SFX 24 0 न्जेल [उ]
SFX 24 0 उन्जेल [ि]
SFX 24 0 िन्जेल [^उिइ]
SFX 24 0 इन्जेल [ि]
SFX 24 उ इन्जेल [उ]
SFX 24 0 िन् [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 िन [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इन [उ]
SFX 24 0 िनस् [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इनस् [उ]
SFX 24 उ इँन [उ] 
SFX 24 0 िँन [^उइि] 
SFX 24 0 िनौ [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इनौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 िनन् [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इनन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 िस् [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इस् [उ]
SFX 24 0 िनेछ [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इनेछ [उ]
SFX 24 0 िएला [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इएला [उ]
SFX 24 उ ऊ [उ]
SFX 24 0 ुन् [^उिइ]
SFX 24 0 उन् [ि]
SFX 24 उ उन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 िछस् [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इछस् [उ]
SFX 24 0 िछन् [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इछन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 िछ [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इछ [उ]
SFX 24 उ ऊँ [उ]
SFX 24 0 ऊँ [ि]
SFX 24 0 ुँ [^उिइ]
SFX 24 0 ेको [^इिउ]
SFX 24 0 एको [इि]
SFX 24 0 ेका [^इिउ]
SFX 24 0 एका [इि]
SFX 24 0 ला [^इि]
SFX 24 0 एला [इि]
SFX 24 0 न .
SFX 24 0 नेबारे .
SFX 24 0 छु [उ]
SFX 24 0 छौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 छस् [उ]
SFX 24 0 छौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 छेस् [उ]
SFX 24 0 छ [उ]
SFX 24 0 छ्यौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 छे [उ]
SFX 24 0 छन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 छिन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 थिस् [उ]
SFX 24 0 थ्यौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 थ्यौ [उ]
SFX 24 0 थे [उ]
SFX 24 0 थ्यो [उ]
SFX 24 0 थि  [उ]
SFX 24 0 थिन् [उ]
SFX 24 0 दैछौ .
SFX 24 0 यौ  [इि]
SFX 24 0 ्यौ  [^उइि]
SFX 24 उ इन [उ] 
SFX 24 0 िन [^उइि]
SFX 24 0 उ [ि]
SFX 24 0 ु [^उिइ]


SFX 25 Y 3
SFX 25 0 ि/24X .
SFX 25 0 ाउ/24X .
SFX 25 0 ाइ/24X .

SFX 26 Y 39
SFX 26 0 पनि .
SFX 26 0 अगाडि .
SFX 26 0 पछाडि .
SFX 26 0 सम्बन्धि .
SFX 26 0 मुन्तिर .
SFX 26 0 को .
SFX 26 0	का .
SFX 26 0	मा .
SFX 26 0	बाट .
SFX 26 0 पछि .
SFX 26 0	माथि .
SFX 26 0	मै .
SFX 26 0	अघि .
SFX 26 0	पछि .
SFX 26 0	जस्तो .
SFX 26 0	जस्ता .
SFX 26 0	जस्तै .
SFX 26 0	देखि .
SFX 26 0	मात्र .
SFX 26 0	सम्म .
SFX 26 0	सम्मको .
SFX 26 0	सम्मका .
SFX 26 0	भित्र .
SFX 26 0	भित्रको .
SFX 26 0	भित्रै .
SFX 26 0	प्रति .
SFX 26 0	भन्दा .
SFX 26 0	बारे .
SFX 26 0	समेत .
SFX 26 0	कै .
SFX 26 0	लगायत .
SFX 26 0	लगायतका .
SFX 26 0	तिर .
SFX 26 0	बाहेक .
SFX 26 0	लाइ .
SFX 26 0	तर्फ .
SFX 26 0	मध्ये .
SFX 26 0	भर .
SFX 26 0	भरि .

SFX 27 Y 56
SFX 27 0 कहाँ .
SFX 27 0 पनि .
SFX 27 0 चाहिँँ .
SFX 27 0 बिच .
SFX 27 0 अगाडि .
SFX 27 0 पछाडि .
SFX 27 0 सम्बन्धि .
SFX 27 0 को .
SFX 27 0 का .
SFX 27 0	मा .
SFX 27 0	ले .
SFX 27 0	लाइ .
SFX 27 0	बाट .
SFX 27 0	सँग .
SFX 27 0	सँगको .
SFX 27 0	सँगका .
SFX 27 0	सँगै .
SFX 27 0	द्वारा .
SFX 27 0	सित .
SFX 27 0	पछि .
SFX 27 0	मार्फत .
SFX 27 0	माथि .
SFX 27 0	माथिबाट .
SFX 27 0	मै .
SFX 27 0	अघि .
SFX 27 0	पछिका .
SFX 27 0	पछिकि .
SFX 27 0	जस्तो .
SFX 27 0	जस्ता .
SFX 27 0	जस्तै .
SFX 27 0	देखि .
SFX 27 0	मात्र .
SFX 27 0	सम्म .
SFX 27 0	सम्ममा .
SFX 27 0	सम्मका .
SFX 27 0	भित्र .
SFX 27 0	प्रति .
SFX 27 0	प्रतिको .
SFX 27 0	प्रतिका .
SFX 27 0	भन्दा .
SFX 27 0 भन्दापर .
SFX 27 0	बारे .
SFX 27 0	समेत .
SFX 27 0	कै .
SFX 27 0	लगायत .
SFX 27 0	लगायतका .
SFX 27 0	तिर .
SFX 27 0	बाहेक .
SFX 27 0	अनुसार .
SFX 27 0	मध्ये .
SFX 27 0 कहा .
SFX 27 0 चाहि .
SFX 27 0	सग .
SFX 27 0	सगको .
SFX 27 0	सगका .
SFX 27 0	सगै .

SFX 28 Y 27
SFX 28 0 को .
SFX 28 0	का .
SFX 28 0	मा .
SFX 28 0	पछि .
SFX 28 0	मै .
SFX 28 0	अघि .
SFX 28 0	अघिदेखि .
SFX 28 0	पछिका .
SFX 28 0	पछिकि .
SFX 28 0	जस्तो .
SFX 28 0	जस्ता .
SFX 28 0	जस्तै .
SFX 28 0	देखि .
SFX 28 0	मात्र .
SFX 28 0	सम्म .
SFX 28 0	सम्ममा .
SFX 28 0	सम्मका .
SFX 28 0	भित्र .
SFX 28 0	भित्रमा .
SFX 28 0	भन्दा .
SFX 28 0	भन्दापर .
SFX 28 0	बारे .
SFX 28 0	समेत .
SFX 28 0	कै .
SFX 28 0	लगायत .
SFX 28 0	तिर .
SFX 28 0	बाहेक .


SFX 29 Y 53
SFX 29 0 पनि .
SFX 29 0 अगाडि .
SFX 29 0 पछाडि .
SFX 29 0 सम्बन्धि .
SFX 29 0 बारे .
SFX 29 0	को .
SFX 29 0	का .
SFX 29 0 मा .
SFX 29 0	ले .
SFX 29 0	बाट .
SFX 29 0	सँग .
SFX 29 0	सँगको .
SFX 29 0	सँगका .
SFX 29 0	सँगै .
SFX 29 0	द्वारा .
SFX 29 0	सित .
SFX 29 0	पछि .
SFX 29 0	मार्फत .
SFX 29 0	माथि .
SFX 29 0	माथिबाट .
SFX 29 0	मै .
SFX 29 0	अघि .
SFX 29 0	अघिदेखि .
SFX 29 0	पछिका .
SFX 29 0	जस्तो .
SFX 29 0	जस्ता .
SFX 29 0	जस्तै .
SFX 29 0	देखि .
SFX 29 0	मात्र .
SFX 29 0	सम्म .
SFX 29 0	सम्ममा .
SFX 29 0	सम्मका .
SFX 29 0	भित्र .
SFX 29 0	भित्रै .
SFX 29 0	प्रति .
SFX 29 0	भन्दा .
SFX 29 0	भन्दापर .
SFX 29 0	बारे .
SFX 29 0	समेत .
SFX 29 0	कै .
SFX 29 0	लगायत .
SFX 29 0	तिर .
SFX 29 0	बाहेक .
SFX 29 0	अनुसार .
SFX 29 0	लाइ .
SFX 29 0	मध्ये .
SFX 29 0	सहित .
SFX 29 0	सहितको .
SFX 29 0	सहितका .
SFX 29 0	सग .
SFX 29 0	सगको .
SFX 29 0	सगका .
SFX 29 0	सगै .


SFX 30 Y 48
SFX 30 0 पनि .
SFX 30 0 को .
SFX 30 0	का .
SFX 30 0	मा .
SFX 30 0	ले .
SFX 30 0	बाट .
SFX 30 0	अगाडि .
SFX 30 0	पछाडि .
SFX 30 0	सँग .
SFX 30 0	सँगको .
SFX 30 0	सँगका .
SFX 30 0	सँगै .
SFX 30 0	द्वारा .
SFX 30 0 सित .
SFX 30 0	पछि .
SFX 30 0 मार्फत .
SFX 30 0	माथि .
SFX 30 0	माथिबाट .
SFX 30 0	मै .
SFX 30 0	अघि .
SFX 30 0	अघिदेखि .
SFX 30 0	पछिका .
SFX 30 0	जस्तो .
SFX 30 0	जस्ता .
SFX 30 0	जस्तै .
SFX 30 0	देखि .
SFX 30 0	मात्र .
SFX 30 0	सम्म .
SFX 30 0	सम्ममा .
SFX 30 0	सम्मका .
SFX 30 0	भित्र .
SFX 30 0	भित्रै .
SFX 30 0	प्रति .
SFX 30 0	भन्दा .
SFX 30 0	भन्दापर .
SFX 30 0	बारे .
SFX 30 0	समेत .
SFX 30 0	कै .
SFX 30 0	लगायत .
SFX 30 0	लगायतका .
SFX 30 0	तिर .
SFX 30 0	बाहेक .
SFX 30 0	लाइ .
SFX 30 0	मध्ये .
SFX 30 0	सग .
SFX 30 0	सगको .
SFX 30 0	सगका .
SFX 30 0	सगै .

SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 िकरण/15X,22X .

SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 ता/15X,18X .

SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 ता/15X,22X .

SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 िय .

SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 वाचि .

SFX 36 Y 3
SFX 36 0 ात्मक .
SFX 36 ा ात्मक ा 
SFX 36 ि ्यात्मक ि

SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 िकृत .

SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 ियता .

SFX 39 Y 4
SFX 39 0 िक .
SFX 39 ा िक ा
SFX 39 ि िक ि
SFX 39 ि िक ि

SFX 40 Y 2
SFX 40 0 ान्तरण/15X,22X,34X .
SFX 40 ा ान्तरण/15X,22X,34X ा
