nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.dic
अकर्मक/31,37
अक्टोपस/30,18
अक्टोबर/28
अक्वेरिअम/29,18
अक्सफोर्ड/29,18
अक्सिजन/29,18
अकुसल/33
अगणन/34
अगस्त/28
अग्निकुन्ड/18,29
अग्रसर/33
अङ्ग/18,22,15,37
अछाम/26
अज्ञ/32
अड्डा/26
अतिमानव/34
अदक्ष/32
अधिनस्थ/32
अधैर्य/33
अनक्षर/36
अननुनास/39
अनव/37
अन्तर्जात/34
अन्तर्प्रादेस/39
अन्ध/32
अनास्था/29
अनिन्दन/34
अनिस्चित/33
अनुकरण/15,22,36
अनुक्रम/18,22,15,39
अनुत्तिर्ण/32
अनुनास/39
अनुपयुक्त/32
अनुपादेय/32
अनुभव/18,22,15,36
अनुरणन/36
अनुरुप/32
अनुल्लङ्घन/34
अनुस्ठान/18,22,15,39
अनैकान्त/39
अपराधि/18,27
अपरिपक्व/33
अप्रधान/32
अप्राकृत/39
अप्रिय/32
अपुर्ण/33
अपेक्षण/34
अभ्यास/18,22,15,36
अभिन्न/32
अभियोज्य/33
अभिवन्दन/15,22,34
अभिसुन्य/37
अमनक/37
अमानविय/32
अमानुस/39
अयथार्थ/32
अयोग/36
अरस/39
अर्का/15,27
अर्थ/18,22,15,35
अर्पण/15,22,38
अराजक/33
अलङ्घन/34
अल्पकाल/39
अवस्था/18,22,15,40
अव्यय/18,22,15,35
अवाञ्छन/34
अवास्तव/39
अविज्ञ/32
अस्लिल/33
असास्त्र/34
असत्य/15,22,33
असमर्थ/32
अस्तित्व/15,22,35
अस्थिर/33
असामान्य/33
आकास/26
आखेट/15,22,39
आगमन/18,22,15,36
आचरण/18,22,15,34
आचार/39
आत्मा/15,22,40
आधुनिक/33,31
आफैं/27
आबद्ध/32
आयाम/18,22,15,39
आयुध/39
आयुर्वेद/15,22,34,39
आर्थिक/31
आलोचन/34,36
आवास/18,22,15,34,39
आस्वादन/34
उत्कृस्ट/32
उत्सुक/33
उद्‌बोधन/34
उदार/31
उपक्षेत्र/18,22,15,34
उपभोग्य/32
उपलब्ध/18,22,15,33
उल्लेखन/34
उस्/32
ऋण/15,22,36
एक/31,33,36,37
एकसदन/36
एकाग्र/33
एकाध/39
कट्टर/33
कति/27
कथन/18,22,15,38
करण/15,22,34
कर्कस/18,22,15,33
कर्म/15,22,35,36
कल्पना/18,22,15,38
क्रिया/18,22,15,35,36
क्षण/18,22,15,39
क्षमासिल/33
काठमाडौँ/26
कार्तिक/28
कुल/18,22,15,39
कुसल/33
केन्द्र/18,22,15,31,34,37,39
खण्ड/18,22,15,34
गमन/34
गम्भिर/33
गुण/18,22,15,36
गुप्ति/15,22,31
घन/18,22,15,36
चल/15,22,32
चिन्तन/34
चुक्/1,41,33
छिन्ननास/39
जल/15,22,34
जालझेल/29
जिल्ला/18,26
जैव/39
टन/29
तटस्थ/15,22,37
तद्देस/34
तनमन/29
तह/18,22,15,38
त्यतै/26
ताके/33
तिनै/27
तिब्बत/26
तुर्र/34
तुल्य/32
दृढ/33
दृस्य/15,22,36
दर्सक/27
दल/34
दसम/39
दस्तखत/18,29
द्यौता/18,27
द्विसदन/36
दानव/18,22,15,34,37,38
दास/18,22,15,33
दुर्बल/32
दुवै/26
दुर/15,22,32
दैव/18,22,15,39
धृस्ट/33
ध्वनि/15,22,36
धारण/15,22,34
धिर/32
नकरा/36
नमन/15,22,34,38
नव/31,37
न्याय/15,22,39
न्युन/31,33
नागरिक/18,22,15,33
नाम/18,22,15,35,39
निकृस्ट/32
निज/31
निन्दा/15,22,36
नियमित/33
निरन्तर/15,22,33,39
निर्जल/34
निर्जिव/31
निर्दलिय/33
निर्दोस/32
निर्माण/15,22,36
निस्छल/32
निस्सस्त्र/37
निसेध/15,22,36
पृथक/33,37
पद/15,22,34,39
पर्दा/18,29
पर्याय/15,22,35
पर्यावरण/15,22,34
परिक्रमा/15,22,36
परिकार/18,29
परिगृहित/32
परिचय/18,22,15,35,36
परिवञ्चन/34
प्रकृत/31
प्रक्रिया/18,22,15,35
प्रकास/15,22,36
प्रचुर/32
प्रजातन्त्र/15,22,31
प्रत्यक्ष/31,37
प्रतिक्रिया/18,22,15,36
प्रतियोगिता/18,22,15,36
प्रतिवद्ध/33
प्रतिक/36
प्रभावसालि/32
प्रमाण/15,22,31,39
प्रलेख/15,22,34
प्रस्तुत/15,22,31
प्राकृत/39
प्राचिन/33
प्रादेस/31,39
प्रारम्भ/15,22,39
प्रासङ्गिक/32
प्रेरणार्थ/31
पाचन/15,22,34
पासविक/31
पुरोभागि/32
पुर्णवयस्क/33
पुर्वस्थान/34
पैसाच/39
बन्दिप्रत्यक्ष/31
ब्याइ/8,43,32
बोध/36
भगवान/18,27
भर्/1,41,33
भवि/32
भाव/15,22,35,36,39
भुक्षेत्र/34
भुराजनिति/30
महाराज/18,27
माओवादि/18,27
मातृसत्ता/36
माध्यम/15,22,39
मानक/15,22,37
मानव/18,22,15,31,33,34,37,38
मापन/15,22,34
मायि/39
मित्र/18,27,33
मित्ररास्ट्र/18,29
मुद्रणालय/26
मेडिकल/29
मौलिक/33
योग्य/32
यौन/15,22,39
रकम/29
रणनिति/15,22,39
रमण/34
रस/15,22,36,39
राजतन्त्र/15,22,36
राजनिति/15,22,39
राजसत्ता/36
राजा/27,18
रासायन/39
रुप/15,22,40
रेखा/15,22,36
रेस्टुराँ/26,18
लाखौँ/27,18
लायक/18,27
लुब्ध/32
वचनबद्ध/33
वटा/30
वर्ग/15,22,31,34,37
वर्जन/15,22,34
वर्ण/15,22,36
वर्णन/15,22,34,38
वर्णानुक्रम/15,22,39
वस/15,22,31,37
व्यक्त/37
व्याकरण/18,22,15,36
व्यापार/18,22,15,39
व्यावहारिक/33
वाक्य/18,22,15,36
वायव/34
वास्प/15,22,31,34
विकल/33,37
विकेन्द्र/31
विचारस्वतन्त्र/33
विद्युत/15,22,31
विधि/18,22,15,39
विफल/33
विभ्रम/15,22,36
विभेद/31
विमुद्र/37
विलङ्घन/34
विविध/31,33
विवेचन/18,22,15,34,36
विसृङ्खल/33
विसिस्ट/31,33
विसेसण/18,22,15,35
विसय/18,22,15,36
विस्तृत/31
विसैन्य/37
विहिन/33
वेदन/34
वैज्ञानिक/31
वैध/31,37
वैधानिक/31,33
सृङ्खला/18,26
सहर/18,22,15,31
स्राद्ध/15,22,34,39
सालिन/32
सासक/34
सिल्प/15,22,39
सुद्ध/31,33,37
सुस्क/32
सृजनसिल/33
संयोग/36
संलग्न/18,27
संवरण/34
संवेग/18,22,15,36
सकर्मक/31,37
सक्रिय/32
सकार/15,22,36
सङ्क्षिप्त/36,37
सङ्क्षेप/37
सङ्गठन/15,22,36
सङ्घ/34,36
सजात/34
सन्दिग्ध/32
सन्देह/15,22,36
सब/27
सम्पन्न/32
सम्बोधन/15,22,34
सम्भाव्य/33
सम्मुख/31
समावेस/15,22,31
सम/31,37
समुह/18,22,15,31
सरल/31,37
ससक्त/31,32
सहाय/15,22,32
स्तर/15,22,31
स्थाय/31
स्मरण/15,22,34
स्व/31
स्वच्छन्द/33
स्विकार/15,22,36
साधन/15,22,34,35
सामयिक/32
सामुहिक/31
सारिण/31
साहस/15,22,39
सुन्दर/32
सुरक्षागार्ड/18,27
सुस्थिर/32
सुक्ष्म/32
सैनिक/18,22,15,31
हत्यारा/18,27
हस्त/40
हिन/33
पर्वत/15,22,34
अकमक/25
जोस/25
रक्त/25
झोक/25
ठुस्स/25
रौस/25
लठ्ठ/25
धप/25
काण्माडौँ/26
प्रविन/27
आइतबार/28
क्याल्कुलेटर/29
साँप/30
स्थान/40
वाक्यान्तर/39
मङ्सिर/28
रुपिया/29
प्रतिक्षालय/18,29
पञ्च/18,26
सुकुम्बासि/18,27
चोलि/29
भोलिपल्ट/28,48
काठमाडौ/26
रेस्टुरा/26,18
लाखौ/27,18
काण्माडौ/26
साप/30
